Georgia, session 2025_26, SB278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 26 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to standards,
labeling, and adulteration of food, is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
"ARTICLE 19
26-2-470.
This article shall be known and may be cited as the 'Corn Masa Nutrition Enhancement
Act.'
S. B. 278
- 1 -

LC 60 0085
26-2-471.
As used in this article, the term:
(1) 'Commissioner' means the Commissioner of Agriculture.
(2) 'Corn masa flour' means a dry flour-like food product made from corn that has been
treated with slaked lime or otherwise undergoes a process known as nixtamalization.
(3) 'Cottage food operator' means a person who produces cottage food products only for
sale directly to a consumer who does not offer such food products or components of such
food products for resale.
(4) 'Cottage food product' means a food product not requiring temperature control for
safety which is produced in an individual's primary domestic residence using
noncommercial equipment, including, but not limited to, baked goods, jams, jellies, and
preserves.
(5) 'Food product' shall have the same meaning as 'food' as defined in Code Section
26-2-21.
(6) 'Food service establishment' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section
26-2-370.
(7) 'Manufacturer' means:
(A) Any entity which manufactures, makes, produces, or causes to be produced corn
masa flour or wet corn masa product to be sold in this state or corn masa flour or wet
corn masa product that such entity intends to be sold in this state;
(B) The first purchaser of corn masa flour or wet corn masa product manufactured
anywhere that intends to resell such corn masa flour or wet corn masa product in this
state regardless of whether the original manufacturer, maker, or producer intends such
corn masa flour or wet corn masa product to be sold in this state; or
(C) Any entity which becomes a successor of an entity described in subparagraph (A)
or (B) of this paragraph.
S. B. 278
- 2 -

LC 60 0085
(8) 'Person' means any individual, partnership, association, firm, public or private
corporation, trust, or unincorporated organization. Such term shall include a
manufacturer.
(9) 'Snack food' means a food product that is intended for immediate consumption, is
typically pre-packaged in small or single-serving portions, and is primarily consumed
between meals, including, but is not limited to, chips, crisps, or extruded food products.
Such term shall not include a food product primarily made from corn masa flour or wet
corn masa products that is bulk packaged or is commonly used as a primary ingredient
in meal preparation, including, but not limited to, tortillas.
(10) 'Wet corn masa product' means a food product manufactured by using an alkali
solution with corn kernels to transform them into nixtamal. Such term shall not include
a food product made with corn masa flour.
26-2-472.
(a) Beginning on July 1, 2026, except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code
section:
(1) All corn masa flour manufactured, sold, delivered, distributed, held, offered for sale,
or used as an ingredient in the manufacture of a food product shall contain folic acid at
a level of 0.7 milligrams of folic acid per pound of corn masa flour within an acceptable
industry standard deviation of error;
(2) All wet corn masa product manufactured, sold, delivered, distributed, held, offered
for sale, or used as an ingredient in the manufacture of a food product shall contain folic
acid at a level of 0.4 milligrams of folic acid per pound of end product within an
acceptable industry standard of deviation of error; and
(3) No person shall distribute, sell, or offer for sale in this state any newly manufactured
corn masa flour or wet corn masa product unless such corn masa flour or wet corn masa
product contains:
S. B. 278
- 3 -

LC 60 0085
(A) A declaration of folic acid on the nutrition label, as required by any applicable
federal law, including, but not limited to, 21 C.F.R. Section 101.9; and
(B) A declaration on the product label that such product contains corn masa flour or
was manufactured through a wet corn masa manufacturing process.
(b) The provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to:
(1) Any person that manufactures, sells, delivers, distributes, holds, offers for sale, or
uses as an ingredient in the manufacture of snack foods corn masa flour;
(2) A cottage food operator, or a supplier to any such operator, that manufactures, sells,
delivers, distributes, holds, offers for sale, or uses as an ingredient in the manufacture of
cottage food products corn masa flour; or
(3) A food service establishment that uses as an ingredient in the manufacture of food
products corn masa flour.
(c) The Commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations as, in his or her
judgment, may be necessary to carry out and implement the purposes of this article.
(d) Any person who violates this article or any orders, rules, or regulations promulgated
by the Commissioner under authority of this article shall, upon conviction thereof, be
subject to a fine for each and every offense in a sum not exceeding $100.00, to
imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or both."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 278
- 4 -